Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.100

Minor repair and maintenance capital accounts.

A host district of a cooperative skill center must maintain a separate minor repair and maintenance capital account for facilities constructed or renovated with state funding. Participating school districts must make annual deposits into the account to pay for future minor repair and maintenance costs of those facilities. The host district has authority to collect those deposits by charging participating districts an annual per-pupil facility fee.

[ 2017 c 187 s 1.]